de: Art der Stromversorgung des Keyboards: Netzteil (Netzstrom); Netzteil oder Batterie (Dual Power); Batteriebetrieben; USB-betrieben; Sonstige
ru: Тип питания клавишного инструмента: Адаптер переменного тока (от сети); Адаптер переменного тока или батарея (двойное питание); От батареи; От USB; Другое
pt-BR: Teclado tipo de alimentação: Adaptador CA (energia da rede); Adaptador CA ou bateria (alimentação dupla); Movido a bateria; Alimentado por USB; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de alimentare al claviaturii: Adaptor CA (alimentare de la rețea); Adaptor CA sau baterie (alimentare duală); Alimentare cu baterii; Alimentare prin USB; Altele
tr: Klavye güç kaynağı türü: AC adaptör (şebeke gücü); AC adaptör veya pil (çift güç); Pille çalışan; USB ile çalışan; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de fonte de alimentação do teclado: Adaptador de CA (corrente elétrica); Adaptador de CA ou bateria (alimentação dupla); A bateria; Alimentação por USB; Outro
zh-TW: 鍵盤供電類型: AC 變壓器 (主電源); AC 變壓器或電池 (雙電源); 電池供電; USB 供電; 其他
en: Keyboard power supply type: AC adapter (mains power); AC adapter or battery (dual power); Battery-powered; USB-powered; Other
it: Tipo di alimentazione della tastiera: Adattatore CA (alimentazione di rete); Adattatore CA o batteria (doppia alimentazione); Alimentato a batteria; Alimentato tramite USB; Altro
fr: Type d’alimentation du clavier: Adaptateur secteur (alimentation secteur); Adaptateur secteur ou batterie (double alimentation); Alimenté par batterie; Alimenté par USB; Autre
th: ประเภทแหล่งจ่ายไฟคีย์บอร์ด: อะแดปเตอร์ AC (ไฟบ้าน); อะแดปเตอร์ AC หรือแบตเตอรี่ (พลังงานคู่); ใช้พลังงานแบตเตอรี่; ใช้พลังงาน USB; อื่นๆ
fi: Kosketinsoittimen virtalähteen tyyppi: Verkkovirtasovitin (verkkovirta); Verkkovirtasovitin tai paristo (kaksiosainen virtalähde); Paristokäyttöinen; USB-käyttöinen; Muu
da: Type strømforsyning til keyboardet: AC-adapter (lysnet); AC-adapter eller batteri (dobbelt strøm); Batteridrevet; USB-drevet; Andet
vi: Loại nguồn điện bàn phím: Bộ đổi nguồn AC (nguồn điện chính); Bộ đổi nguồn AC hoặc pin (nguồn điện kép); Chạy bằng pin; Chạy bằng USB; Khác
nl: Keyboard stroomvoorziening type: AC-adapter (netstroom); AC-adapter of batterij (dubbele voeding); Op batterijen; Gevoed via USB; Anders
pl: Typ zasilania keyboardu: Zasilacz sieciowy (AC); Zasilacz lub bateria (zasilanie podwójne); Zasilanie bateryjne; Zasilanie przez USB; Inne
es: Tipo de alimentación del teclado: Adaptador de CA (red eléctrica); Adaptador de CA o batería (alimentación dual); Funciona con batería; Funciona con USB; Otro
hr-HR: Supply napajanja tipkovnice: AC adapter (mrežno napajanje); AC adapter ili baterija (dvostruko napajanje); Na baterije; USB napajanje; Ostalo
lt-LT: Klavišinio maitinimo tipas: Kintamosios srovės adapteris (maitinimas iš tinklo); Kintamosios srovės adapteris arba baterija (dvigubas maitinimas); Maitinama baterijomis; Maitinama per USB; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta napajanja klaviature: Napajalnik AC (omrežno napajanje); Napajalnik AC ali baterija (dvojno napajanje); Baterijsko napajanje; Napajanje USB; Drugo
hu: A billentyűzet tápellátásának típusa: AC-adapter (hálózati áram); AC-adapter vagy akkumulátor (kettős áramellátás); Elemmel/akkumulátorral működő; USB-tápellátású; Egyéb
ja: キーボード電源Supplyタイプ: AC アダプター (主電源); AC アダプターまたはバッテリー (デュアルパワー); バッテリー駆動; USB 駆動; その他
bg-BG: Тип захранване на клавир: Променливотоков адаптер (мрежово захранване); Променливотоков адаптер или батерия (двойно захранване); Захранване с батерии; USB захранване; Друго
el: Τύπος τροφοδοσίας πλήκτρων: Τροφοδοτικό AC (κεντρική παροχή); Τροφοδοτικό AC ή μπαταρία (διπλή τροφοδοσία); Με μπαταρία; Τροφοδοσία USB; Άλλο
zh-CN: 键盘电源类型: 交流适配器（市电）; 交流适配器或电池（双电源）; 电池供电; USB 供电; 其他
sv: Typ av strömförsörjning för keyboard: Nätadapter (nätström); Nätadapter eller batteri (dubbel strömförsörjning); Batteridriven; USB-driven; Övrigt
cs: Typ napájení klávesnice: Síťový adaptér (napájení ze sítě); Síťový adaptér nebo baterie (duální napájení); Napájení z baterie; Napájení přes USB; Jiné
ko: 키보드 전원 공급 유형: AC 어댑터(전원 연결); AC 어댑터 또는 배터리(이중 전원); 배터리 구동식; USB 구동식; 기타
sk-SK: Typ napájania klávesov: Sieťový adaptér (napájanie zo siete); Sieťový adaptér alebo batéria (duálne napájanie); Napájanie z batérie; Napájanie z USB; Iné
nb: Strømforsyningstype for keyboard: Strømadapter (nettstrøm); Strømadapter eller batteri (dobbel strømforsyning); Batteridrevet; USB-drevet; Annet